North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-16 Licensing Medical Hospitals

23-16-01.
Licensure of medical hospitals and state hospitals. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

After July 1, 1947, no person, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, county or municipal corporation, or agency thereof, which maintains and operates organized facilities for the diagnosis, treatment, or care of two or more nonrelated persons suffering from illness, injury, or deformity or where obstetrical or other care is rendered over a period exceeding twenty-four hours, may be established, conducted, or maintained in the state of North Dakota without obtaining annually a license therefor in the manner hereinafter provided in sections 23-16-02 and 23-16-03. Chiropractic hospitals, sanatoriums, and hospitals such as those for unmarried mothers maintained and operated by the department of human services are not required to obtain a license under this chapter.

In the case of emergency or transfer beds attached to and forming a part of a licensed medical doctor’s office, the state department of health has the right of inspection, but no license may be required under the provisions of this chapter when the number of such beds does not exceed four.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 10; 1953, ch. 176, § 1; 1957, ch. 186, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1601; S.L. 1989, ch. 317, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 262, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Substance abuse programs, licensing of, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-31.

Basic care facility, licensing of, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-09.3.

Chiropractic hospitals, licensing of, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-17.

Developmental center at westwood park, Grafton, see N.D.C.C. ch. 25-04.

Health maintenance organizations, power to operate hospitals, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-18.1-04.

Maternity homes, licensing of, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-19.

Medical hospital receivership, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-16.1.

State hospital at Jamestown, see N.D.C.C. ch. 25-02.

State medical center, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-52.

Collateral References.

Nursing or rest homes, licensing and regulation of, 53 A.L.R.4th 689.

23-16-01.
Licensure of medical hospitals and state hospitals. [Effective September 1, 2022]

After July 1, 1947, no person, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, county or municipal corporation, or agency thereof, which maintains and operates organized facilities for the diagnosis, treatment, or care of two or more nonrelated persons suffering from illness, injury, or deformity or where obstetrical or other care is rendered over a period exceeding twenty-four hours, may be established, conducted, or maintained in the state of North Dakota without obtaining annually a license therefor in the manner hereinafter provided in sections 23-16-02 and 23-16-03. Chiropractic hospitals, sanatoriums, and hospitals such as those for unmarried mothers maintained and operated by the department of health and human services are not required to obtain a license under this chapter.

In the case of emergency or transfer beds attached to and forming a part of a licensed medical doctor’s office, the department of health and human services has the right of inspection, but no license may be required under the provisions of this chapter when the number of such beds does not exceed four.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 10; 1953, ch. 176, § 1; 1957, ch. 186, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1601; S.L. 1989, ch. 317, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 262, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 211, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-01.1.
Moratorium on expansion of long-term care bed capacity.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Notwithstanding sections 23-16-06 and 23-16-10, except when a facility reverts basic care beds to nursing facility beds or relicenses nursing facility beds delicensed after July 31, 2011, nursing facility beds may not be added to the state’s licensed bed capacity during the period between August 1, 2021, and July 31, 2023. A nursing facility may not delicense nursing facility bed capacity, relicense nursing facility bed capacity, convert licensed nursing bed capacity to basic care bed capacity, revert licensed basic care bed capacity back to nursing facility bed capacity, or otherwise reconfigure licensed nursing facility bed capacity more than two times in a twelve-month period.

Transfer of licensed nursing facility bed capacity from a nursing facility to another entity is permitted. The nursing facility may transfer the bed capacity either as nursing facility bed capacity or basic care bed capacity. Transferred bed capacity must become licensed by an entity within seventy-two months of transfer. Bed capacity transferred as basic care bed capacity may not be reverted to nursing facility bed capacity at any time. A receiving entity may transfer the received bed capacity to another entity within the seventy-two-month period originally established at the time the nursing facility first transferred the licensed nursing facility bed capacity. The subsequent receiving entity must license the received bed capacity within the seventy-two-month period originally established at the time of the first transfer.

A nursing facility may convert licensed nursing facility bed capacity to basic care. If the converted beds remain in the same facility and are not transferred, the beds may revert to nursing facility status after one year of licensure as basic care beds.

Nursing facility beds that are converted to basic care may be transferred as basic care beds. However, upon the transfer, the basic care beds may not be relicensed as nursing facility beds.

If a federally recognized tribal nation acquires nursing facility beds, the tribal facility must meet state licensing requirements for those beds within seventy-two months of acquisition. A tribal facility may seek to participate in the medical assistance programs. Medical assistance payments may only be made to a Medicaid certified tribal facility that agrees to participate and adhere to all federal and state requirements of the medical assistance program, including participation, screening, ratesetting, and licensing requirements.

A nursing facility, upon prior written notice to the state department of health, may delicense a maximum of thirty percent of its licensed nursing facility bed capacity and have the delicensed nursing facility held for a period of forty-eight months. The total delicensed nursing facility bed capacity that may be held for a nursing facility at no time may be greater than fifty percent of the number of currently licensed beds in the nursing facility. Delicensed nursing facility bed capacity in excess of fifty percent of the nursing facility’s licensed capacity may not be held and is not eligible for the provisions of subsection 7. Delicensed bed capacity not sold or relicensed at the conclusion of the forty-eight-month holding period ceases to exist.

During the forty-eight-month holding period established at the time of delicensure, delicensed nursing facility bed capacity that is being held for the nursing facility may be:

Relicensed by the nursing facility. Relicensing of nursing facility bed capacity may not occur for six months from the time of delicensure.

Transferred to another entity as nursing facility bed capacity or basic care bed capacity. The receiving entity must license the transferred bed capacity as the type of bed capacity transferred within a seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer. Bed capacity transferred as basic care bed capacity may not be reverted to nursing facility bed capacity at any time. A receiving entity may transfer the received bed capacity to another entity within the seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer. The subsequent receiving entity must license the received bed capacity within the seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer.

Licensed as basic care beds by the same facility. If the licensed basic care beds remain in the same facility and are not transferred, the beds may be reverted to licensed nursing facility bed capacity after twelve months.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a nursing facility bed transferred before July 1, 2019, must be relicensed by the receiving entity within a seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a nursing facility bed in the layaway program before July 1, 2019, may remain in the program for forty-eight months from the time the bed was first laid away.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 254, § 3; 1997, ch. 12, § 15; 1999, ch. 236, § 2; 2001, ch. 237, § 2; 2001, ch. 431, § 10; 2003, ch. 216, § 2; 2005, ch. 241, § 1; 2007, ch. 240, § 2; 2009, ch. 218, § 2; 2011, ch. 188, § 2; 2011, ch. 189, § 2; 2013, ch. 210, § 2; 2015, ch. 190, § 2, effective April 9, 2015; 2017, ch. 11, § 37, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 208, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 201, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-16-01.1

was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 212 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 1 of Chapter 205, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1065; and Section 2 of Chapter 201, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1332.

23-16-01.1.
Moratorium on expansion of long-term care bed capacity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Notwithstanding sections 23-16-06 and 23-16-10, except when a facility reverts basic care beds to nursing facility beds or relicenses nursing facility beds delicensed after July 31, 2011, nursing facility beds may not be added to the state’s licensed bed capacity during the period between August 1, 2021, and July 31, 2023. A nursing facility may not delicense nursing facility bed capacity, relicense nursing facility bed capacity, convert licensed nursing bed capacity to basic care bed capacity, revert licensed basic care bed capacity back to nursing facility bed capacity, or otherwise reconfigure licensed nursing facility bed capacity more than two times in a twelve-month period.

Transfer of licensed nursing facility bed capacity from a nursing facility to another entity is permitted. The nursing facility may transfer the bed capacity either as nursing facility bed capacity or basic care bed capacity. Transferred bed capacity must become licensed by an entity within seventy-two months of transfer. Bed capacity transferred as basic care bed capacity may not be reverted to nursing facility bed capacity at any time. A receiving entity may transfer the received bed capacity to another entity within the seventy-two-month period originally established at the time the nursing facility first transferred the licensed nursing facility bed capacity. The subsequent receiving entity must license the received bed capacity within the seventy-two-month period originally established at the time of the first transfer.

A nursing facility may convert licensed nursing facility bed capacity to basic care. If the converted beds remain in the same facility and are not transferred, the beds may revert to nursing facility status after one year of licensure as basic care beds.

Nursing facility beds that are converted to basic care may be transferred as basic care beds. However, upon the transfer, the basic care beds may not be relicensed as nursing facility beds.

If a federally recognized tribal nation acquires nursing facility beds, the tribal facility must meet state licensing requirements for those beds within seventy-two months of acquisition. A tribal facility may seek to participate in the medical assistance programs. Medical assistance payments may only be made to a Medicaid certified tribal facility that agrees to participate and adhere to all federal and state requirements of the medical assistance program, including participation, screening, ratesetting, and licensing requirements.

A nursing facility, upon prior written notice to the department of health and human services, may delicense a maximum of thirty percent of its licensed nursing facility bed capacity and have the delicensed nursing facility held for a period of forty-eight months. The total delicensed nursing facility bed capacity that may be held for a nursing facility at no time may be greater than fifty percent of the number of currently licensed beds in the nursing facility. Delicensed nursing facility bed capacity in excess of fifty percent of the nursing facility’s licensed capacity may not be held and is not eligible for the provisions of subsection 7. Delicensed bed capacity not sold or relicensed at the conclusion of the forty-eight-month holding period ceases to exist.

During the forty-eight-month holding period established at the time of delicensure, delicensed nursing facility bed capacity that is being held for the nursing facility may be:

Relicensed by the nursing facility. Relicensing of nursing facility bed capacity may not occur for six months from the time of delicensure.

Transferred to another entity as nursing facility bed capacity or basic care bed capacity. The receiving entity must license the transferred bed capacity as the type of bed capacity transferred within a seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer. Bed capacity transferred as basic care bed capacity may not be reverted to nursing facility bed capacity at any time. A receiving entity may transfer the received bed capacity to another entity within the seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer. The subsequent receiving entity must license the received bed capacity within the seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer.

Licensed as basic care beds by the same facility. If the licensed basic care beds remain in the same facility and are not transferred, the beds may be reverted to licensed nursing facility bed capacity after twelve months.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a nursing facility bed transferred before July 1, 2019, must be relicensed by the receiving entity within a seventy-two-month period established at the time of transfer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a nursing facility bed in the layaway program before July 1, 2019, may remain in the program for forty-eight months from the time the bed was first laid away.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 254, § 3; 1997, ch. 12, § 15; 1999, ch. 236, § 2; 2001, ch. 237, § 2; 2001, ch. 431, § 10; 2003, ch. 216, § 2; 2005, ch. 241, § 1; 2007, ch. 240, § 2; 2009, ch. 218, § 2; 2011, ch. 188, § 2; 2011, ch. 189, § 2; 2013, ch. 210, § 2; 2015, ch. 190, § 2, effective April 9, 2015; 2017, ch. 11, § 37, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 208, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 201, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 205, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 212, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-02.
Existing medical hospitals.

Institutions subject to this chapter which are already in operation at the time of enactment of this chapter must be given a reasonable time, not to exceed one year from the date of the enactment of this chapter, within which to comply with the rules, regulations, and minimum standards provided for herein.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1602.

23-16-03.
Application for license — License fee. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Applicants for license shall file applications under oath with the state department of health upon forms prescribed. Applications must be signed by the owner, or in the case of a corporation by two of its officers, or in the case of a county or municipal unit by the head of the governmental department having jurisdiction over it. Applications must set forth the full name and address of the owner of the institution for which license is sought, the names of the persons in control thereof, and such additional information as the state department of health may require, including affirmative evidence of ability to comply with such minimum standards, rules, and regulations as may be lawfully prescribed pursuant to this section. An application for a license for facilities not owned by the state or its political subdivisions must be accompanied by the following fees:

For each licensed acute care bed, ten dollars.

For each licensed skill care bed, ten dollars.

License fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state department of health services operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1603; S.L. 1987, ch. 6, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 4, § 12.

23-16-03.
Application for license — License fee. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Applicants for license shall file applications under oath with the department of health and human services upon forms prescribed. Applications must be signed by the owner, or in the case of a corporation by two of its officers, or in the case of a county or municipal unit by the head of the governmental department having jurisdiction over it. Applications must set forth the full name and address of the owner of the institution for which license is sought, the names of the persons in control thereof, and such additional information as the department of health and human services may require, including affirmative evidence of ability to comply with such minimum standards, rules, and regulations as may be lawfully prescribed pursuant to this section. An application for a license for facilities not owned by the state or its political subdivisions must be accompanied by the following fees:

For each licensed acute care bed, ten dollars.

For each licensed skill care bed, ten dollars.

License fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the department of health and human services operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1603; S.L. 1987, ch. 6, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 4, § 12; 2021, ch. 352, § 213, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-04.
Licenses. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Licenses issued hereunder expire one year after date of issuance or upon such uniform dates annually, as the health council may prescribe by rule. Licenses must be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and are not transferable or assignable. Licenses must be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1604.

23-16-04.
Licenses. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Licenses issued hereunder expire one year after date of issuance or upon such uniform dates annually, as the department of health and human services may prescribe by rule. Licenses must be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and are not transferable or assignable. Licenses must be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1604; 2021, ch. 352, § 214, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-05.
Inspections, consultations, and approval of plans. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall make or cause to be made such inspections as may be prescribed by regulation. The health council may prescribe by regulations that any licensee or prospective applicant desiring to make a substantial alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications therefor to the state department of health for preliminary inspection, recommendation, and approval.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1605; S.L. 1961, ch. 199, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Establishment of basic standards for hospitals by health council, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-03.

23-16-05.
Inspections, consultations, and approval of plans. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall make or cause to be made such inspections as may be prescribed by regulation. The health council may prescribe by regulations that any licensee or prospective applicant desiring to make a substantial alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications therefor to the department of health and human services for preliminary inspection, recommendation, and approval.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1605; S.L. 1961, ch. 199, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 215, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-06.
Authority to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall issue licenses for the operation of institutions subject to this chapter which are found to comply with the provisions of this chapter and such regulations as are lawfully promulgated by the health council. The state health officer with the approval of the health council may, after a hearing, suspend or revoke licenses issued hereunder on any of the following grounds:

Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

Permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any unlawful act.

Conduct or practices detrimental to the health or safety of patients and employees of said institutions; provided that this provision may not be construed to have any reference to practices authorized by law; and provided further that no license may be suspended or revoked for any trivial violation.

No application for a license may be denied, or any licenses suspended or revoked, except after a hearing before the health council held pursuant to written notice to the applicant or licensee, served by registered or certified mail, which notice must concisely state the grounds for such denial or for such proposed suspension or revocation and must fix the time and place of hearing which may not be less than thirty days after the date of the mailing of such notice. After such hearing, the council shall make an order, either denying the application for license or granting the same, or suspending or revoking such license, or dismissing the proceedings to suspend or revoke as the merits of the case warrant. The council shall send a copy of its order to the applicant or licensee by registered or certified mail, which must contain its findings and conclusions, and such order, except an order of dismissal, becomes final thirty days after the date of mailing unless the applicant or licensee appeals therefrom in the manner provided by section 23-16-10.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1606; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

Hearings before health council, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-03.

23-16-06.
Authority to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall issue licenses for the operation of institutions subject to this chapter which are found to comply with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted by the department. The state health officer with the approval of the health council may, after a hearing, suspend or revoke licenses issued hereunder on any of the following grounds:

Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

Permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any unlawful act.

Conduct or practices detrimental to the health or safety of patients and employees of said institutions; provided that this provision may not be construed to have any reference to practices authorized by law; and provided further that no license may be suspended or revoked for any trivial violation.

No application for a license may be denied, or any licenses suspended or revoked, except after a hearing before the health council held pursuant to written notice to the applicant or licensee, served by registered or certified mail, which notice must concisely state the grounds for such denial or for such proposed suspension or revocation and must fix the time and place of hearing which may not be less than thirty days after the date of the mailing of such notice. After such hearing, the council shall make an order, either denying the application for license or granting the same, or suspending or revoking such license, or dismissing the proceedings to suspend or revoke as the merits of the case warrant. The council shall send a copy of its order to the applicant or licensee by registered or certified mail, which must contain its findings and conclusions, and such order, except an order of dismissal, becomes final thirty days after the date of mailing unless the applicant or licensee appeals therefrom in the manner provided by section 23-16-10.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1606; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 216, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-07.
Not applicable to certain laws.

This chapter may not be construed in any way to restrict or modify any law pertaining to the placement and adoption of children or the care of unmarried mothers.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1607.

Cross-References.

Adoption, see N.D.C.C. ch. 14-15.

Child-placing agencies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-12.

Maternity homes, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-19.

23-16-08.
Offering or advertising to dispose of infants prohibited. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

No hospital providing maternity care may in any way offer to dispose of any child or advertise that it will give children for adoption or hold itself out, directly or indirectly, as being able to dispose of children, however, such hospitals may inform an unmarried mother of child-placing agencies licensed by the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1608; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 46; 1985, ch. 521, § 2; 1987, ch. 570, § 3.

Cross-References.

Maternity homes forbidden to offer to place children for adoption, see N.D.C.C. § 50-19-11.

23-16-08.
Offering or advertising to dispose of infants prohibited. [Effective September 1, 2022]

No hospital providing maternity care may in any way offer to dispose of any child or advertise that it will give children for adoption or hold itself out, directly or indirectly, as being able to dispose of children, however, such hospitals may inform an unmarried mother of child-placing agencies licensed by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1608; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 46; 1985, ch. 521, § 2; 1987, ch. 570, § 3; 2021, ch. 352, § 217, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-08.1.
Access to pharmacist.

Irrespective of the type of distribution system used, no person may refuse to allow a resident of a nursing home, as defined in subsection 3 of section 43-34-01, to choose a pharmacist of the resident’s choice for the compounding and dispensing of drugs pursuant to chapter 43-15.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 297, § 1.

23-16-09.
Information confidential. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Information other than reports relating to vital statistics received by the state department of health through inspection or otherwise, authorized under this chapter are confidential and may not be disclosed publicly except in a proceeding involving the question of license. No agent of the state department of health or of any board of health, may disclose individually identifiable health information of such an institution obtained in the course of a survey or inspection except in a judicial or administrative proceeding in response to an order of a court or administrative tribunal.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1609; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 13.

Cross-References.

Health maintenance organizations, confidentiality of medical information, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-18.1-23.

Hearing on denial or revocation of maternity home license, see N.D.C.C. § 50-19-13.

Records of maternity home confidential, see N.D.C.C. § 50-19-10.

Vital statistics, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-02.1.

23-16-09.
Information confidential. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Information other than reports relating to vital statistics received by the department of health and human services through inspection or otherwise, authorized under this chapter are confidential and may not be disclosed publicly except in a proceeding involving the question of license. No agent of the department of health and human services or of any board of health, may disclose individually identifiable health information of such an institution obtained in the course of a survey or inspection except in a judicial or administrative proceeding in response to an order of a court or administrative tribunal.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1609; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 211, § 13; 2021, ch. 352, § 218, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-10.
Appeal.

An appeal may be taken to the district court from any order of the state health officer or health council denying an application for a license to operate a medical hospital or related institution, or suspending or revoking a license, or from any order denying an application for a construction project. Any such appeal must be taken in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1610.

23-16-11.
Penalties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any institution subject to this chapter, without first obtaining a license as required by this chapter, or who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of an infraction.

In addition to any criminal sanctions that may be imposed pursuant to law, any person maintaining or operating a nursing facility licensed by the department who is found guilty of knowingly violating any provision of this title or any rules adopted under this title, or any person maintaining or operating a nursing facility found to have deficiencies during a survey of the nursing facility, may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation and for each day the violation continues plus interest and any costs incurred by the department to enforce this penalty. This civil penalty may be imposed by a court in a civil proceeding or by the state health officer through an administrative hearing under chapter 28-32. If a civil penalty levied by the department after an administrative hearing is not paid within thirty days after a final determination that a civil penalty is owed, unless the determination of a civil penalty is appealed to a district court, the civil penalty and any costs incurred by the department to enforce the penalty may be withheld from payments due to the person or nursing facility from the department of human services. Any funds received as penalties must be applied to protect residents of the nursing facility, to relocate residents, to maintain operation of the nursing facility, and to reimburse residents for loss of personal funds.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1611; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 250; 1991, ch. 275, § 1.

Cross-References.

Penalty for infraction, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-16-11.
Penalties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any institution subject to this chapter, without first obtaining a license as required by this chapter, or who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of an infraction.

In addition to any criminal sanctions that may be imposed pursuant to law, any person maintaining or operating a nursing facility licensed by the department who is found guilty of knowingly violating any provision of this title or any rules adopted under this title, or any person maintaining or operating a nursing facility found to have deficiencies during a survey of the nursing facility, may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation and for each day the violation continues plus interest and any costs incurred by the department to enforce this penalty. This civil penalty may be imposed by a court in a civil proceeding or by the state health officer through an administrative hearing under chapter 28-32. If a civil penalty levied by the department after an administrative hearing is not paid within thirty days after a final determination that a civil penalty is owed, unless the determination of a civil penalty is appealed to a district court, the civil penalty and any costs incurred by the department to enforce the penalty may be withheld from payments due to the person or nursing facility from the department of health and human services. Any funds received as penalties must be applied to protect residents of the nursing facility, to relocate residents, to maintain operation of the nursing facility, and to reimburse residents for loss of personal funds.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1611; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 250; 1991, ch. 275, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 219, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-12.
Injunction. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health, in accordance with the laws of the state governing injunctions and other process, may maintain an action in the name of the state against any person, partnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company for establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any hospital within the meaning of the chapter without first having a license therefor as herein provided or without first obtaining from the state department of health written approval of plans and specifications for major alterations of, additions to, or construction of health facilities.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1612; S.L. 1961, ch. 199, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-16-12.
Injunction. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services, in accordance with the laws of the state governing injunctions and other process, may maintain an action in the name of the state against any person, partnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company for establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any hospital within the meaning of the chapter without first having a license therefor as herein provided or without first obtaining from the department of health and human services written approval of plans and specifications for major alterations of, additions to, or construction of health facilities.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 200, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1612; S.L. 1961, ch. 199, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 220, effective September 1, 2022.

23-16-13.
Appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

23-16-14.
Participation in abortion — Not mandatory.

No hospital, physician, nurse, hospital employee, nor any other person is under any duty, by law or contract, nor may such hospital or person in any circumstances be required to participate in the performance of an abortion, if such hospital or person objects to such abortion. No such person or institution may be discriminated against because the person or institution so objects. For purposes of this section, “abortion” means the act of using or prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance, device, or means with the intent to terminate the clinically diagnosable intrauterine pregnancy of a woman, including the elimination of one or more unborn children in a multifetal pregnancy, with knowledge that the termination by those means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn child. Such use, prescription, or means is not an abortion if done with the intent to save the life or preserve the health of the unborn child; remove a dead unborn child caused by spontaneous abortion; or treat a woman for an ectopic pregnancy.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 2011, ch. 109, § 14.

23-16-15.
Umbilical cord blood donation.

Unless it is medically inadvisable, a hospital shall allow a pregnant patient to arrange for the blood extracted from the umbilical cord of the patient’s newborn child to be donated to a public cord blood bank. A patient who agrees to donate cord blood to a public cord blood bank may not be charged for the costs of collecting, storing, or transporting the cord blood.

A hospital is not required to collect cord blood if in the professional judgment of a licensed physician the collection of the cord blood would threaten the health of the mother or newborn child. This section does not require a hospital or hospital employee, including a physician, nurse, or other medical staff, to collect cord blood if the collection of cord blood conflicts with the bona fide religious practices and beliefs of the hospital or hospital employee. This section does not require a hospital to arrange for the donation of blood extracted from umbilical cords.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1.

23-16-16.
Treatment of victims of sexual assault.

As used in this section:

“Hospital” means an entity required to obtain a license under section 23-16-01.

“Sexual assault” has the same meaning as provided under section 12.1-20-07.

“Victim of sexual assault” means an individual who:

States a sexual assault has been committed against the individual;

Is accompanied by another individual who states a sexual assault has been committed against the accompanied individual; or

Hospital personnel or a sexual assault nurse examiner have reason to believe is a victim of sexual assault.

A hospital may not require a victim of sexual assault to submit to a forensic examination or to report the alleged sexual assault to law enforcement.

A hospital without staff specially trained to perform a sexual assault forensic examination may coordinate with a community-based sexual assault nurse examiner nurse program or develop a sexual assault examiner nurse program to ensure all victims of sexual assault who want a sexual assault forensic examination or sexually transmitted infection treatment receive that examination or treatment.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 191, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.